Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1750
Seller-assisted marketing plan; service of process.

Selling or offering to sell a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the seller in any action arising under the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 50;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 77;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 18.